Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3656.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.06, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Red light camera; penalty. (a) Subject to subdivision 11, if a motor vehicle is operated in violation of a traffic-control signal and the violation is identified through the use of a red light camera system implemented under section 169.147, the owner of the vehicle or the lessee of the vehicle is guilty of a petty misdemeanor and must pay a fine of $40. (b) A person who commits a first offense under paragraph (a) must be given a warning and is not subject to a fine or conviction under paragraph (a). A person who commits a second offense under paragraph (a) is eligible for diversion, which must include a traffic safety course established under section 169.147, subdivision 11. A person who enters diversion and completes the traffic safety course is not subject to a fine or conviction under paragraph (a). (c) Paragraph (b) does not apply to: (1) a violation that occurs in a commercial motor vehicle; or (2) a violation committed by a holder of a class A, B, or C commercial driver's license or commercial driver learner's permit, without regard to whether the violation was committed in a commercial motor vehicle or another vehicle. deleted text begin (d) This subdivision applies to violations committed on or after August 1, 2025, and before August 1, 2029. deleted text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.06, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Red light camera; limitations. (a) An owner or lessee of a motor vehicle is not subject to a fine or conviction under subdivision 10 if any of the conditions under section 169.14, subdivision 14, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (7), are met. (b) The owner or lessee of a motor vehicle may not be issued a citation under subdivision 10 and under another subdivision in this section for the same conduct. (c) A fine or conviction under subdivision 10 does not constitute grounds for revocation or suspension of a person's driver's license. deleted text begin (d) Except as provided in subdivision 10, paragraph (c), this subdivision applies to violations committed on or after August 1, 2025, and before August 1, 2029. deleted text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.14, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Speed safety camera; penalty. (a) Subject to subdivision 14, if a motor vehicle is operated in violation of a speed limit and the violation is identified through the use of a speed safety camera system implemented under section 169.147, the owner of the vehicle or the lessee of the vehicle is guilty of a petty misdemeanor and must pay a fine of: (1) $40; or (2) $80, if the violation is for a speed at least 20 miles per hour in excess of the speed limit. (b) A person who commits a first offense under paragraph (a) must be given a warning and is not subject to a fine or conviction under paragraph (a). A person who commits a second offense under paragraph (a) is eligible for diversion, which must include a traffic safety course established under section 169.147, subdivision 11. A person who enters diversion and completes the traffic safety course is not subject to a fine or conviction under paragraph (a). (c) Paragraph (b) does not apply to: (1) a violation that occurs in a commercial motor vehicle; or (2) a violation committed by a holder of a class A, B, or C commercial driver's license or commercial driver learner's permit, without regard to whether the violation was committed in a commercial motor vehicle or another vehicle. deleted text begin (d) This subdivision applies to violations committed on or after August 1, 2025, and before August 1, 2029. deleted text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.14, subdivision 14, is amended to read: Subd. 14. Speed safety camera; limitations. (a) An owner or lessee of a motor vehicle is not subject to a fine or conviction under subdivision 13 if: (1) the vehicle was stolen at the time of the violation; (2) a transfer of interest in the vehicle in compliance with section 168A.10 was made before the time of the violation; (3) the vehicle owner is a lessor of the motor vehicle, and the lessor identifies the name and address of the lessee; (4) the vehicle is an authorized emergency vehicle operated in the performance of official duties at the time of the violation; (5) another person is convicted, within the meaning under section 171.01, subdivision 29, for the same violation; (6) the vehicle owner provides a sworn statement to the court or prosecuting authority that the owner was not operating the vehicle at the time of the violation; or (7) the vehicle owner provides a sworn statement to the court or prosecuting authority that the owner was operating the vehicle at the time of the violation under the circumstances of a medical emergency for either the driver or a passenger in the vehicle. (b) The owner or lessee of a motor vehicle may not be issued a citation under subdivision 13 and under another subdivision in this section for the same conduct. (c) Except as provided in subdivision 13, paragraph (c), a fine or conviction under subdivision 13 does not constitute grounds for revocation or suspension of a person's driver's license. (d) A vehicle owner asserting a defense under paragraph (a), clause (7), must provide an accompanying sworn statement from the physician responsible for treatment of the underlying condition or emergency that necessitated medical attention. deleted text begin (e) This subdivision applies to violations committed on or after August 1, 2025, and before August 1, 2029. deleted text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.147, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Camera-based traffic enforcement" means enforcement of traffic control through the use of a red light camera system, speed limits through the use of a speed safety camera system, or both. (c) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of transportation. (d) "Commissioners" means the commissioner of transportation as the lead in coordination with the commissioner of public safety. (e) "Implementing authority" means either: (1) the commissioners with respect to trunk highways for the work zone pilot deleted text begin programdeleted text end new text begin projectnew text end provided under subdivision 17; or (2) a local authority deleted text begin specified in paragraph (f)deleted text end that implements the traffic safety camera system deleted text begin pilotdeleted text end program. deleted text begin (f) "Local authority" means either the city of Minneapolis or the city of Mendota Heights, which are authorized to conduct the pilot program. deleted text end deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end "Monitoring site" means a location at which a traffic safety camera system is placed and operated under this section. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end "deleted text begin Pilotdeleted text end Program" means the traffic safety camera deleted text begin pilotdeleted text end program established in this section. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end "Traffic enforcement agent" means a licensed peace officer or an employee of a local authority who is designated as provided in this section. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.147, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. deleted text begin Pilotdeleted text end Program establishment. (a) In conformance with this section, the commissioner of transportation, in coordination with the commissioner of public safety, must establish a traffic safety camera deleted text begin pilotdeleted text end program that provides for education and enforcement of speeding violations, traffic-control signal violations, or both in conjunction with use of traffic safety camera systems. deleted text begin (b) The authority for camera-based traffic enforcement under the pilot program is limited to August 1, 2025, to July 31, 2029. deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end Only the following may implement camera-based traffic enforcement under the deleted text begin pilotdeleted text end program: (1) the commissioners, as provided under deleted text begin paragraph (d)deleted text end new text begin subdivision 17new text end ;new text begin andnew text end (2)new text begin a county, a statutory or home rule charter city,new text end the city of Minneapolisdeleted text begin , as provided underdeleted text end new text begin subject tonew text end paragraph deleted text begin (e); anddeleted text end new text begin (c), or a town.new text end deleted text begin (3) the city of Mendota Heights. deleted text end deleted text begin (d) Under the pilot program, the commissioners must, beginning August 1, 2025, commence enforcement of speeding violations in trunk highway work zones as specified under subdivision 17. deleted text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The city of Minneapolis is prohibited from implementing the deleted text begin pilotdeleted text end program or camera-based traffic enforcement through or in substantive coordination with the city's police department. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.147, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Public engagement and notice. (a) The commissioner and each implementing authority must maintain information on their respective websites that, at a minimum: (1) summarizes implementation of traffic safety camera systems under the deleted text begin pilotdeleted text end program; (2) provides each camera system impact study performed by the implementing authority under subdivision 6, paragraph (b); (3) provides information and procedures for a person to contest a citation under the deleted text begin pilotdeleted text end program; and (4) identifies the enforcement locations under the deleted text begin pilotdeleted text end program. (b) An implementing authority must: (1) implement a general public engagement and information campaign prior to commencing camera-based speed enforcement under the deleted text begin pilotdeleted text end program; (2) perform public engagement as part of conducting a camera system impact study under subdivision 6, paragraph (b); and (3) place conspicuous signage prior to the motorist's arrival at each monitoring site, which must: (i) notify motor vehicle operators of the use of a traffic safety camera system to detect violations; and (ii) if a speed safety camera is in use, identify the speed limit. (c) Public engagement under paragraph (b) must include but is not limited to: (1) outreach to populations that are traditionally underrepresented in public policy or planning processes; (2) consolidation and analysis of public feedback; and (3) creation of an engagement summary that identifies public feedback and the resulting impacts on implementation of camera-based traffic enforcement. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.147, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Citations; warnings. (a) A traffic enforcement agent under the deleted text begin pilotdeleted text end program has the exclusive authority to issue a citation to the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle for (1) a violation under section 169.06, subdivision 10, and (2) a violation under section 169.14, subdivision 13. (b) A traffic enforcement agent may only issue a citation if: (1) the violation is committed at least 30 days after the relevant implementing authority has commenced camera-based traffic enforcement; (2) with respect to speed limits, the speeding violation is at least ten miles per hour in excess of the speed limit; and (3) a traffic enforcement agent has inspected and verified recorded images provided by the traffic safety camera system. (c) An implementing authority must provide a warning for a traffic-control signal violation under section 169.06, subdivision 10, or a speeding violation under section 169.14, subdivision 13, for the period from (1) the date when camera-based traffic enforcement is first commenced, to (2) the date when citations are authorized under paragraph (b), clause (1). (d) Notwithstanding section 169.022, an implementing authority may specify a speed in excess of the speed limit that is higher than the amount specified in paragraph (b), clause (2), at which to proceed with issuance of a citation. (e) A citation may be issued through the United States mail if postmarked within: (1) 14 days of the violation for a vehicle registered in Minnesota; or (2) 30 days of the violation for a vehicle registered outside of Minnesota. Section 168.346, subdivision 2, applies to a private entity that provides citation mailing services under this section. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.147, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Uniform citation. (a) There must be a uniform traffic safety camera citation issued throughout the state by a traffic enforcement agent for a violation as provided under this section. The uniform traffic safety camera citation is in the form and has the effect of a summons and complaint. (b) The commissioner of public safety must prescribe the detailed form of the uniform traffic safety camera citation. As appropriate, the citation design must conform with the requirements for a uniform traffic ticket under section 169.99, subdivisions 1 and 1d. The citation design must include: (1) a brief overview of the deleted text begin pilotdeleted text end program and implementation of traffic safety camera systems; (2) a summary of the circumstances of the citation that includes identification of the motor vehicle involved, the date and time of the violation, and the location where the violation occurred; (3) copy of the recorded image or primary images used to identify a violation; (4) a notification that the recorded images under clause (3) are evidence of a violation under section 169.06, subdivision 10, or 169.14, subdivision 13; (5) a statement signed by the traffic enforcement agent who issued the citation stating that the agent has inspected the recorded images and determined that the violation occurred in the specified motor vehicle; (6) a summary of the limitations under sections 169.06, subdivision 11, and 169.14, subdivision 14; (7) notification that an owner is ineligible for diversion if the violation was committed by a holder of a class A, B, or C commercial driver's license or commercial driver learner's permit, without regard to whether the violation was committed in a commercial motor vehicle or another vehicle; (8) information on the diversion and traffic safety course eligibility and requirements under sections 169.06, subdivision 10, paragraph (b), and 169.14, subdivision 13, paragraph (b); (9) the total amount of the fine imposed; (10) a notification that the person has the right to contest the citation; (11) information on the process and procedures for a person to contest the citation; and (12) a statement that payment of the fine constitutes a plea of guilty and failure to appear in court is considered a plea of guilty, as provided under section 169.91. (c) The commissioner of public safety must make the information required under paragraph (b) available in languages that are commonly spoken in the state and in each area in which a local authority has implemented camera-based traffic enforcement. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.147, subdivision 14, is amended to read: Subd. 14. Data practices; general requirements. (a) All data collected by a traffic safety camera system are private data on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12, or nonpublic data as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 9, unless the data are public under section 13.82, subdivision 2, 3, or 6, or are criminal investigative data under section 13.82, subdivision 7. (b) An agreement with a private entity and an implementing authority pursuant to subdivision 12 is subject to section 13.05, subdivisions 6 and 11. (c) A private entity must use the data gathered under this section only for purposes of camera-based traffic enforcement under the deleted text begin pilotdeleted text end program and must not share or disseminate the data with an entity other than the appropriate implementing authority, except pursuant to a court order. Nothing in this subdivision prevents a private entity from sharing or disseminating summary data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 19. (d) Traffic safety camera system data are not subject to subpoena, discovery, or admission into evidence in any prosecution, civil action, or administrative process that is not taken pursuant to section 169.06, subdivision 10, or 169.14, subdivision 13. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.12, subdivision 6a, is amended to read: Subd. 6a. Driving record; traffic safety camera system. (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), the commissioner must not record on an individual's driving record any violation of: (1) a traffic-control signal under section 169.06, subdivision 10; or (2) a speed limit under section 169.14, subdivision 13. (b) This subdivision does not apply to: (1) a violation that occurs in a commercial motor vehicle; or (2) a violation committed by a holder of a class A, B, or C commercial driver's license or commercial driver learner's permit, without regard to whether the violation was committed in a commercial motor vehicle or another vehicle. deleted text begin (c) This subdivision applies to violations committed on or after August 1, 2025, and before August 1, 2029. deleted text end Sec. 12. Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 3, section 62, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective August 1, 2025deleted text begin , and expires August 1, 2029deleted text end . Sec. 13. Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 3, section 113, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective August 1, 2025deleted text begin , and expires August 1, 2029deleted text end . Sec. 14. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.147, subdivision 19, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-06731 169.147 TRAFFIC SAFETY CAMERA SYSTEM PILOT PROGRAM. Subd. 19. Expiration. This section expires July 31, 2029.